District of Columbia statutes.
6-1041.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Housing Production Trust Fund” means the fund established by Chapter 28 of Title 42 [§ 42-2801 et seq.].

(2)

“Inclusionary Development” means developments subject to the Inclusionary Zoning Program pursuant to 11 DCMR § 2602.1.

(3)

“Inclusionary unit” means a unit set aside for sale or rental to low- and moderate-income households as required by the Inclusionary Zoning Program.

(4)

“Inclusionary Zoning Program” means all of the provisions of Chapter 26 of Title 11 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (11 DCMR 2600 et seq.), this subchapter, and the regulations promulgated under the authority of this subchapter.

(5)

“Low-income household” means a household of one or more individuals with a total annual income adjusted for household size equal to or less than 50% of the Metropolitan Statistical Area median as certified by the Mayor.

(6)

“Moderate-income household” means a household of one or more individuals with a total annual income adjusted for household size equal to between 51% and 80% of the Metropolitan Statistical Area median as certified by the Mayor.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-275, § 101, 54 DCR 880
This section is referenced in § 1-301.181 and § 2-1831.03.